Utah statutes.
76-10-1213.   Corporate defendants -- Summons -- Subpoena duces tecum.
(1) (a)  The attendance in court of a corporation for purposes of commencing
or prosecuting a criminal action against it under this part may be
accomplished by the issuance and service of a summons. A summons shall be
issued by a magistrate if he finds probable cause that material in the
possession of the corporation against which the summons is sought is
pornographic or harmful to minors, which finding shall be upon affidavit
describing with specificity the material alleged to be pornographic or harmful
to minors or by another manner or means the magistrate finds necessary.
(b)  Where practical, the material alleged to be pornographic or harmful to
minors shall be attached to the affidavit so as to afford the magistrate the
opportunity to examine this material.
(c)  The summons must be served upon the corporation by delivery of it to an
officer, director, managing or general agent, or cashier, or assistant cashier
of the corporation.
(2)  The production of material alleged to be pornographic or harmful to
minors in any proceedings under this part against a corporation may be
compelled by the issuance and service of a subpoena duces tecum. This section
does not prohibit or limit the use of a subpoena duces tecum in proceedings
against natural persons under this part.
